District of Columbia statutes.
1-636.02

Effective date provisions.

(a)

The provisions of subchapters IX (except §§ 1-609.04, 1-609.07, and 1-609.09) and X of this chapter, subsection (a) of § 1-605.01, subsection (a) of § 1-606.01 and § 1-606.02 shall become effective 15 days after March 3, 1979.

(b)

The provisions of § 1-632.01 shall become effective on March 3, 1979.

(c)

The provisions of § 1-611.09 shall become effective on March 3, 1979: Provided, however, that such provisions shall only apply to the Mayor, Chairman and members of the Council taking the oath of office after January 1, 1979.

(d)

The provisions of § 1-617.17 shall become effective on September 1, 1978, and shall apply to all negotiations for compensation as authorized under § 1-617.16 for compensation to be paid on and after January 1, 1980.

(e)

The provisions of § 1-611.13 shall become effective on March 3, 1979, apply retroactively to compensation to be paid as provided therein after September 30, 1978, and expire on September 30, 1980: Provided, however, that if a collective bargaining agreement concerning compensation is entered into between appropriate personnel authorities (management) and recognized labor organizations for employees of the Metropolitan Police Department, the District of Columbia Fire Department, or the District of Columbia Board of Education which supersedes the provisions of § 1-611.13, such provisions shall expire on the day after the date that the agreement’s terms commence.

(f)

The Office of Employee Appeals and the Public Employee Relations Board shall each issue rules and regulations for the conduct of their respective business, as provided in §§ 1-604.04(f) and 1-606.02(a)(5), and §§ 1-604.04(e) and 1-605.02(11), respectively, within 180 days of their appointment.

(g)

The provisions of § 1-605.02(11) shall be effective on the date following the day that the members of the Public Employee Relations Board have been appointed: Provided, however, that employees of the Public Employee Relations Board shall provide staff support to the Board of Labor Relations from the date of its taking office.

(h)

The provisions of subchapters I, II, III, IV, VII, XV, XVIII, XX, XXI, XXII, XXIII, XXVI, XXVII, XXVIII, XXIX, XXX, XXXI, XXXIII, XXXIV, and XXXV of this chapter, and §§ 1-625.01 and 1-625.02 shall become effective on April 1, 1979, or on the 60th day following March 3, 1979, whichever is later.

(i)

The provisions of subchapters V, VI, XVI, and XVII of this chapter and § 1-632.03(2) shall become effective 60 days after the date that rules and regulations are issued by the respective Office of Employee Appeals and the Public Employee Relations Board.

(j)

The provisions of subchapters VIII, VIII-A, XI, XII, XIII, XIV, XIX, and XXIV of this chapter shall become effective on January 1, 1980: Provided, however, that any earlier date contained within such subchapters shall be effected.

(k)

The provisions of §§ 1-609.04, 1-609.07, and 1-609.09 shall become effective on January 1, 1980.

(l)

The provisions of this section shall become effective on March 3, 1979.

(m)

The provisions of subchapter XXXII of this chapter shall become effective as follows:

(1)

Paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of § 1-632.02 shall become effective on January 1, 1980;

(2)

Paragraphs (7) and (8) of subsection (a) of § 1-632.02 shall become effective as provided in subsection (i) of this section;

(3)

Paragraphs (9) and (10) of subsection (a) of § 1-632.02 shall become effective as provided in subsection (h) of this section;

(4)

Section 1-632.03 shall become effective on January 1, 1980;

(5)

Sections 38-101 [repealed], 38-105 [repealed], 38-802, 38-1963 note, 38-1968, 38-1202.04, 38-1202.06, and 38-1204.05 shall become effective on January 1, 1980;

(6)

Sections 1-207.61, 1-333.07, 1-321.01, 1-333.09, 1-1217, 1-207.33, 1-207.52, 1-1001.04 to 1-1001.06, 1-1011.01, 1-1031.01, 1-1031.02, 1-1103.01, 2-1201.04, 2-1312, 2-1604, 2-1605, 3-1612 [repealed], 3-327 [repealed], 3-604, 3-606, 3-2903 [repealed], 3-2301.08 [repealed], 47-2886.08, 3-3616 [repealed], 4-105, 6-101.03, 6-641.13, 6-902, 6-301.13 [repealed], 7-2205, 7-503.02, 10-212, 25-104, 29-101.120, 29-301.93, 38-1304, 38-1305, 39-205, 44-708, 44-1919 [repealed], 48-902.13, 32-807, 32-1402, 39-105, 50-2201.03, 50-2608, 50-1216, 34-801, 34-804, 34-806, 42-1203 [repealed], 42-1204 [repealed], 42-1723 [repealed], 51-113, 47-113, 47-825 [repealed], 47-2409, and Organization Order No. 127 shall become effective on January 1, 1980;

(7)

Sections 1-1105.01, 1-1106.01, and 1-1106.02 shall become effective as provided in subsection (a) of this section;

(8)

Section 1-633.06 shall become effective on March 3, 1979;

(9)

Subsection (a) of § 1-632.07 shall become effective as provided in subsection (i) of this section;

(10)

Subsection (d) of § 1-632.07 shall become effective on January 1, 1980;

(11)

Sections 4-838 [repealed], 4-839 [repealed], and 31-1501a [repealed] shall become effective as provided in subsection (d) of this section;

(12)

Subsections (b) and (c) of § 1-632.07 shall become effective on March 1, 1980;

(13)

Section 1-632.08 shall become effective on March 3, 1979; and

(14)

Section 1-632.03(a) and (c) shall become effective on January 1, 1980.

(n)

Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, any personnel authority or agency vested with authority to issue rules and regulations pursuant to § 1-604.04 may issue such rules and regulations prior to the effective date of such authority.

(o)

Persons performing personnel functions to be transferred to the Office of Personnel under the authority of § 1-604.07 shall be transferred no later than 90 days after the Office is created.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3602, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 1, 1979, D.C. Law 3-14, § 2(d), 25 DCR 10565
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(ii), 27 DCR 2632

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-602.04, § 1-605.03, § 1-606.01, § 1-623.46, § 1-632.01, and § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-637.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-366.1.

References in Text

Section 25-104, referred to in subsection (m)(6) of this section, is part of Title 25, D.C. Code, which title was amended and enacted by D.C. Law 13-298, effective May 3, 2001. For disposition of the subject matter of former Title 25, see the Disposition Table preceding § 25-101.

The effective date specified in subsection (a) of this section is calculated to be March 18, 1979.

The Public Employees Relations Board, referred to in subsection (g) of this section, was appointed on January 22, 1980, pursuant to Mayor’s Order 80-11.

The effective date specified in subsection (h) of this section is calculated to be May 2, 1979.

In subsection (i) of this section, the Public Employee Relations Board issued rules and regulations on April 4, 1980 ( 24 DCR 1390) and the Office of Employee Appeals issued rules and regulations on October 3, 1980 ( 27 DCR 4347). The effective dates specified in subsection (i) are calculated to be June 2, 1980 and December 2, 1980, respectively.

Sections 31-1101 note, 31-1122 referred to in subsection (m)(5) were repealed by § 11 of D.C. Law 4-78, effective March 16, 1982.

Concerning the sections referenced to in (m)(6), § 2-212 was repealed by D.C. Law 9-84, effective March 13, 1992; § 2-327 was repealed by D.C. Law 10-152, effective August 23, 1994; §§ 2-1303 and 2-1701.8 were repealed by D.C. Law 6-99, effective March 25, 1986; § 2-327 was repealed by D.C. Law 10-152, effective August 23, 1994; § 45-1903 was repealed by § 34 of D.C. Law 4-209, effective March 10, 1983; and § 47-825 was repealed by D.C. Law 9-241, effective March 17, 1993.

“ Sections 4-838, 4-839, and 31-1501a”, referred to in subsection (m)(11) of this section, did not exist in the 1981 Edition at the time of the recodification into the 2001 Edition.

The sections referred to in (m)(11) were repealed by the Act of March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3207(e).

Section 1-609.09, referenced in (a) and (k), was repealed by D.C. Law 12-260, effective April 20, 1999.